Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,135
Nail technology temporary practitioner; application; qualifications.

An applicant for licensure as a nail technology temporary practitioner shall show evidence that his or her completed application for regular licensure has been accepted by the department, that he or she has not failed any portion of the licensure examination, and that he or she has been accepted for work in a licensed nail technology or cosmetology establishment under the supervision of a licensed nail technician or licensed cosmetologist.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 42;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,194;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 397;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 50.